src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
!! !!!Verb inflection

!! Erzya language verbs inflect for person, subject and object.



!! OBJECT FLAGS AND +V+TV tags


LEXICON VT_ЛЕДЕМС-ObjAll_sub
+Use/Sub: VT_ЛЕДЕМС-ObjAll ;
LEXICON VT_ЛЕДЕМС-ObjAll
+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_ЛЕДЕМС ;

LEXICON VT_КАДОМС-ObjAll_sub
+Use/Sub: VT_КАДОМС-ObjAll ;

LEXICON VT_КАДОМС-ObjAll
+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_КАДОМС ;

! This should not occur
!LEXICON VT_САЕВЕМС-ObjAll
! +V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_САЕВЕМС ;


LEXICON VT_НЕВТЕМС-ObjAll_sub
+Use/Sub: VT_НЕВТЕМС-ObjAll ;

LEXICON VT_НЕВТЕМС-ObjAll
+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_НЕВТЕМС ;

LEXICON VT_САВТОМС-ObjAll_sub
+Use/Sub: VT_САВТОМС-ObjAll ;

LEXICON VT_САВТОМС-ObjAll
+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_САВТОМС ;

LEXICON VT_ЧАЧТОМС-ObjAll_sub
+Use/Sub: VT_ЧАЧТОМС-ObjAll ;

LEXICON VT_ЧАЧТОМС-ObjAll
+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_ЧАЧТОМС ;

!LEXICON VT_ЯНГАВОМС-ObjAll
! +V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_ЯНГАВОМС ;

LEXICON VT_КУНДАМС-ObjAll_sub
+Use/Sub: VT_КУНДАМС-ObjAll ;

LEXICON VT_КУНДАМС-ObjAll
+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_КУНДАМС ;

! This actually does exist in a pair verb
! таргатомс
LEXICON VT_САТОМС-ObjAll_sub
+Use/Sub: VT_САТОМС-ObjAll ;

LEXICON VT_САТОМС-ObjAll
+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_САТОМС ;

! This should not exist by definition
! 
!LEXICON VT_ЛЕТЕМС-ObjAll
! +V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_ЛЕТЕМС ;

LEXICON VT_УЕМС-ObjAll_sub
+Use/Sub: VT_УЕМС-ObjAll ;

LEXICON VT_УЕМС-ObjAll
+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_УЕМС ;

LEXICON VT_ТУЕМС-ObjAll_sub
+Use/Sub: VT_ТУЕМС-ObjAll ;

LEXICON VT_ТУЕМС-ObjAll
+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ Indicative_Present_Obj ;
+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_ТУЕМС ;

LEXICON VT_ТЕЕМС-ObjAll_sub
+Use/Sub: VT_ТЕЕМС-ObjAll ;

LEXICON VT_ТЕЕМС-ObjAll
+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_ТЕЕМС ;

LEXICON VT_НЕЕМС-ObjAll_sub
+Use/Sub: VT_НЕЕМС-ObjAll ;

LEXICON VT_НЕЕМС-ObjAll
+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_НЕЕМС ;

LEXICON VT_МИЕМС-ObjAll_sub
+Use/Sub: VT_МИЕМС-ObjAll ;

LEXICON VT_МИЕМС-ObjAll
+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_МИЕМС ;

LEXICON VT_НЕКШНЕМС-ObjAll_sub
+Use/Sub: VT_НЕКШНЕМС-ObjAll ;

LEXICON VT_НЕКШНЕМС-ObjAll
+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_НЕКШНЕМС ;
!!2012-04-24 the TAG "+ObjOpen":0 has been removed 

LEXICON VT_КУЗЕМС-ObjAll_sub
+Use/Sub: VT_КУЗЕМС-ObjAll ;

LEXICON VT_КУЗЕМС-ObjAll
+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_КУЗЕМС ;

!! !!! VERBS WITH INTRANSITIVE TAGS +V+IV
LEXICON VI_УЕМС
+V+IV: V_УЕМС ;

LEXICON VI_ТУЕМС
+V+IV: V_ТУЕМС ;

LEXICON VI_ТЕЕМС
+V+IV: V_ТЕЕМС ;

LEXICON VI_НЕЕМС
+V+IV: V_НЕЕМС ;

LEXICON VI_МИЕМС
+V+IV: V_МИЕМС ;

LEXICON VI_НЕКШНЕМС_sub
+Use/Sub: VI_НЕКШНЕМС ;

LEXICON VI_НЕКШНЕМС
+V+IV: V_НЕКШНЕМС ;

!касомс:ка
LEXICON VI_КАСОМС
+V+IV: V_КАСОМС ;

!куземс:ку
LEXICON VI_КУЗЕМС
+V+IV: V_КУЗЕМС ;

LEXICON VI_ЛЕДЕМС
+V+IV: V_ЛЕДЕМС ;

LEXICON VI_САВТОМС
+V+IV: V_САВТОМС ;
LEXICON VI_САВТОМС-SG3
+V+IV: V_САВТОМС-SG3 ;
LEXICON VI_САВТОМС-SG3_SUBJ/ZERO
+V+IV+Subj/Zero: V_САВТОМС-SG3 ;

LEXICON VI_ЧАЧТОМС
+V+IV: V_ЧАЧТОМС ;

LEXICON VI_НЕВТЕМС
+V+IV: V_НЕВТЕМС ;

LEXICON VI_КАДОМС
+V+IV: V_КАДОМС ;

LEXICON VI_САЕВЕМС
+V+IV: V_САЕВЕМС ;

LEXICON VI_ЯНГАВОМС
+V+IV: V_ЯНГАВОМС ;

LEXICON VI_КУНДАМС
+V+IV: V_КУНДАМС ;

LEXICON VI_САТОМС
+V+IV: V_САТОМС ;

LEXICON VI_ЛЕТЕМС
 VI_САТОМС ;

!! !!!AUXILIARY VERBS
LEXICON VA_ЯНГАВОМС
+V+VAUX: V_ЯНГАВОМС ;

LEXICON VA_ЯНГАВОМС-SG3
+V+VAUX: V_ЯНГАВОМС-SG3 ;



!! !!!VERBS AFTER TRANSITIVITY Tags OBJECT FLAGS 

LEXICON V_УЕМС
 :й V_КАДОМС ;

LEXICON V_ТУЕМС
                 :й V_КАДОМС ;
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@:0@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ PredIndPrt1Sc3 ;
 IND-PRS-40 ;
 IND-PRS-50 ;

LEXICON V_ТЕЕМС
 V_КАДОМС ;

LEXICON V_НЕЕМС
                 :й V_КАДОМС ;
 @R.CONJ.ObjAll@  Indicative_Present_Obj-in-S ; ! 2012-08-07 неса
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ PredIndPrt1Sc3 ;


LEXICON V_МИЕМС
                 :й V_КАДОМС ;
@R.CONJ.ObjAll@  Indicative_Present_Obj-in-S ; ! 2012-08-07 миса
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ PredIndPrt1Sc3 ;


LEXICON V_НЕКШНЕМС_sub
+Use/Sub: V_НЕКШНЕМС ;
LEXICON V_НЕКШНЕМС
+Stem/е:е V_КУНДАМС ;
+Stem/э:э V_КУНДАМС ;

!касомс:ка
LEXICON V_КАСОМС
:с V_КАДОМС ;
0@U.CONJ-INF.NO@:й@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ PredIndPrt1Sc3 ;

!куземс:ку
LEXICON V_КУЗЕМС
:зь V_ЛЕДЕМС ;
0@U.CONJ-INF.NO@:й@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ PredIndPrt1Sc3 ;


LEXICON V_ЛЕДЕМС
 V_КАДОМС ;

LEXICON V_САВТОМС
 V_КАДОМС ;

LEXICON V_САВТОМС-SG3
 V_КАДОМС-SG3 ;

LEXICON V_ЧАЧТОМС
 V_КАДОМС ;
0@U.CONJ-INF.NO@:а@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ PredIndPrt1Sc3 ;

LEXICON V_НЕВТЕМС
 V_КАДОМС ;

LEXICON V_КАДОМС
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ IND-PRT1-all ;
00@U.CONJ-INF.NO@:%>Ы2@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ IND-PRT2-all ;
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ Conjunctive-kadoms ;


  CondVerbs ;
 VerbsPresPrc_1 ;
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ PredIndPrt1Sc3 ;
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ V_КАДОМС-a ;
 Deverbals-kadoms ;

LEXICON V_КАДОМС-SG3
0@U.CONJ-INF.NO@:%>@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ IND-PRT1-30 ;
00@U.CONJ-INF.NO@:%>Ы2@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ IND-PRT2-30 ;
00@U.CONJ-INF.NO@:%>О1@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ CNJ-30 ;
+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj0000@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.CONJ@:%>Ы2ндеря%>@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.CONJ@ CNJ-30 ;
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.IND@:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.IND@ IND-PRS-30 ;
+ConNeg00@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@:%>О1К3@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@ _КУДО-Tenses1 ;
+Des0000@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.DES@:%>Ы2ксэ@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.DES@ DES-PRT2-30 ;
!! no deverbals

LEXICON V_САЕВЕМС
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ IND-PRT1-all ;
00@U.CONJ-INF.NO@:%>Ы2@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ IND-PRT2-all ;
00@U.CONJ-INF.NO@:%>WLoss@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ Conjunctive-noArrow ;
+Use/Sub+Dial@U.CONJ-INF.NO@:%>О1@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ Conjunctive-noArrow ;

  CondVerbs ;
     VerbsPresPrc_1 ;
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ PredIndPrt1Sc3 ;
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ V_КАДОМС-a ;
  Deverbals-kadoms ;

LEXICON V_САЕВЕМС-SG3
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ IND-PRT1-30 ;
00@U.CONJ-INF.NO@:%>Ы2@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ IND-PRT2-30 ;
00@U.CONJ-INF.NO@:%>WLoss@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ CNJ-30 ;
+Use/Sub+Dial@U.CONJ-INF.NO@:%>О1@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ CNJ-30 ;
+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj0000@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.CONJ@:%>Ы2ндеря%>@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.CONJ@ CNJ-30 ;
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.IND@:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.IND@ IND-PRS-30 ;
+ConNeg00@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@:%>О1К3@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@ _КУДО-Tenses1 ;
+Des0000@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.DES@:%>Ы2ксэ@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.DES@ DES-PRT2-30 ;
!! no deverbals

LEXICON V_ЯНГАВОМС
 V_САЕВЕМС ;
LEXICON V_ЯНГАВОМС-SG3
 V_САЕВЕМС-SG3 ;

LEXICON V_КУНДАМС
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ IND-PRT1-all ;
00@U.CONJ-INF.NO@:%>Ы2@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ IND-PRT2-all ;
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ Conjunctive-kundams ;

  CondVerbs ;
     VerbsPresPrc_1 ;
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ PredIndPrt1Sc3 ;
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ V_КУНДАМС-a ;
  Deverbals-kundams ; !This denies linking vowel



LEXICON V_САТОМС
!2012-10-27! This still needs work
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ IND-PRT1-all-but-Sc3 ;
+Use/Sub@U.CONJ-INF.NO@:0@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ IND-PRT1-Sc3 ;
000@U.CONJ-INF.NO@:%>О1т@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ IND-PRT1-Sc3 ;

00@U.CONJ-INF.NO@:%>Ы2@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ IND-PRT2-all ;
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ Conjunctive-kadoms ;

  CondVerbs ;
     VerbsPresPrc_1 ;
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ V_САТОМС-a ;
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ PredIndPrt1Sc3 ;
  Deverbals-kadoms ; 

LEXICON V_САТОМС-SG3
+Use/Sub@U.CONJ-INF.NO@:%>@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ IND-PRT1-30 ;
0000@U.CONJ-INF.NO@:%>О1т%>@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ IND-PRT1-30 ;
00@U.CONJ-INF.NO@:%>Ы2@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ IND-PRT2-30 ;
00@U.CONJ-INF.NO@:%>О1@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ CNJ-30 ;
+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj0000@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.CONJ@:%>Ы2ндеря%>@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.CONJ@ CNJ-30 ;
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.IND@:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.IND@ IND-PRS-30 ;
+ConNeg00@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@:%>О1К3@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@ _КУДО-Tenses1 ;
+Des0000@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.DES@:%>Ы2ксэ@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.DES@ DES-PRT2-30 ;
!! no deverbals

LEXICON V_ЛЕТЕМС
 V_САТОМС ;
LEXICON V_ЛЕТЕМС-SG3
 V_САТОМС-SG3 ;


LEXICON V_КАДОМС-a
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@ Indicative1 ;
+ConNeg00@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@:%>О1К3@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@ _КУДО-Tenses1 ;
 Desiderative-kadoms ;

 Imperative-kadoms ;
  +Opt@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@:0@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@ Optative-kadoms ;
