src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON verbs
ванстомс:ванст VT_ЧАЧТОМС-ObjAll  "" ;
виемс:ви VT_МИЕМС-ObjAll  "" ;
каземс:казь VT_ЛЕДЕМС-ObjAll  "" ;
касомс:ка VI_КАСОМС  "" ;
кочкомс:кочк VT_КАДОМС-ObjAll  "" ;
куземс:ку VT_КУЗЕМС-ObjAll  "" ;
ладсевтемс:ладсевть VT_НЕВТЕМС-ObjAll  "" ;
ливчакадомс:ливчакад VI_КАДОМС  "" ;
лиевемс:лиев VI_САЕВЕМС  "" ;
лоштявомс:лоштяв VI_ЯНГАВОМС  "" ;
лыкштадемс:лыкштадь VT_ЛЕДЕМС-ObjAll  "" ;
менстнемс:менстне VT_КУНДАМС-ObjAll  "" ;
миемс:ми VT_МИЕМС-ObjAll  "" ;
муемс:му VT_ТУЕМС-ObjAll  "" ;
неемс:не VT_НЕЕМС-ObjAll  "" ;
нуемс:ну VT_ТУЕМС-ObjAll  "" ;
пейдезевтемс:пейдезевть VT_НЕВТЕМС-ObjAll  "" ;
пиемс:пи VI_МИЕМС  "" ;
поладомс:полад VT_КАДОМС-ObjAll  "" ;
пуворемс:пуворь VI_ЛЕДЕМС  "" ;
путкотемс:путкоть VI_ЛЕТЕМС  "" ;
савомс:сав VA_ЯНГАВОМС-SG3  "" ;
савомс:сав VA_ЯНГАВОМС  "" ;
саемс:сай VT_ТЕЕМС-ObjAll  "" ;
синдемс:синдь VT_ЛЕДЕМС-ObjAll  "" ;
стувтневемс:стувтнев VI_САЕВЕМС  "" ;
сыргоземс:сырго VI_КУЗЕМС  "" ;
сювовомс:сювов VI_ЯНГАВОМС  "" ;
сёрмадомс:сёрмад VT_КАДОМС-ObjAll  "" ;
талакадомс:талакад VI_КАДОМС  "" ;
теемс:тей VT_ТЕЕМС-ObjAll  "" ;
туемс:ту VT_ТУЕМС-ObjAll  "" ;
уемс:у VT_УЕМС-ObjAll  "" ;
уралемс:урале VI_КУНДАМС  "" ;
чачтомс:чачт VT_ЧАЧТОМС-ObjAll  "" ;
чиемс:чи VI_МИЕМС  "" ;
эрявомс:эряв VA_ЯНГАВОМС-SG3  "" ;
эрявомс:эряв VA_ЯНГАВОМС  "" ;
юводемс:юводь VI_ЛЕДЕМС  "" ;
ютавтнемс:ютавтне VT_КУНДАМС-ObjAll  "" ;
ёвардомс:ёвард VT_КАДОМС-ObjAll  "" ;
баславомс:баслав VI_ЯНГАВОМС  "" ;
бузмолдомс:бузмолд VI_КАДОМС  "" ;
вадекшнемс:вадекшн VT_НЕКШНЕМС-ObjAll  "" ;
верьгемтемс:верьгемть VT_НЕВТЕМС-ObjAll  "" ;
вырмадемс:вырмадь VT_ЛЕДЕМС-ObjAll  "" ;
гайнекшнемс:гайнекшн VI_НЕКШНЕМС  "" ;
гаямс:гая VI_КУНДАМС  "" ;
дерьгадемс:дерьгадь VI_ЛЕДЕМС  "" ;
дёрк-теемс:дёрк-тей VI_ТЕЕМС  "" ;
дынковтомс:дынковт VT_САВТОМС-ObjAll  "" ;
ёмсетемс:ёмсеть VI_ЛЕТЕМС  "" ;
жойкадекшнемс:жойкадекшн VT_НЕКШНЕМС-ObjAll  "" ;
звездямс:звездя VT_КУНДАМС-ObjAll  "" ;
зэрькадевемс:зэрькадев VI_САЕВЕМС  "" ;
зэрьк-теемс:зэрьк-тей VI_ТЕЕМС  "" ;
казякстуфтумс:казякстуфт VI_САВТОМС  "" ;
кальдерстемс:кальдерсть VI_НЕВТЕМС  "" ;
карновомс:карнов VI_ЯНГАВОМС  "" ;
кельгекшнемс:кельгекшн VI_НЕКШНЕМС  "" ;
кизэлгадомс:кизэлгад VI_КАДОМС  "" ;
клёцькадемс:клёцькадь VI_ЛЕДЕМС  "" ;
консультировамс:консультирова VI_КУНДАМС  "" ;
кувтол-кувтол-теемс:кувтол-кувтол-тей VI_ТЕЕМС  "" ;
култаетемс:култаеть VI_ЛЕТЕМС  "" ;
кундатомс:кундат VI_САТОМС  "" ;
лабордовтомс:лабордовт VT_САВТОМС-ObjAll  "" ;
ледстякшномс:ледстякшно VT_КУНДАМС-ObjAll  "" ;
лепамкшномс:лепамкшн VI_НЕКШНЕМС_sub  "" ;
летькедекшнемс:летькедекшн VI_НЕКШНЕМС  "" ;
лиакстомс:лиакст VI_САВТОМС  "" ;
лопавтнекшнемс:лопавтнекшн VT_НЕКШНЕМС-ObjAll  "" ;
лоткатомс:лоткат VI_САТОМС  "" ;
лымбакстневтемс:лымбакстневть VT_НЕВТЕМС-ObjAll  "" ;
насмудемс:насмудь VT_ЛЕДЕМС-ObjAll  "" ;
ноцк-теемс:ноцк-тей VI_ТЕЕМС  "" ;
ношкстатомс:ношкстат VI_САТОМС  "" ;
нужамс:нужа VI_КУНДАМС  "" ;
оргодстемс:оргодсть VI_НЕВТЕМС  "" ;
оркавтомс:оркавт VT_САВТОМС-ObjAll  "" ;
охаевемс:охаев VI_САЕВЕМС  "" ;
охаекшнемс:охаекшн VI_НЕКШНЕМС  "" ;
пачтекшнемс:пачтекшн VT_НЕКШНЕМС-ObjAll  "" ;
пеляскавтомс:пеляскавт VI_САВТОМС  "" ;
петятемс:петять VI_ЛЕТЕМС  "" ;
потомдомс:потомд VT_КАДОМС-ObjAll  "" ;
рацякалефтемс:рацякалефть VI_НЕВТЕМС  "" ;
сатомс:сат VI_САТОМС  "" ;
сборявомс:сборяв VI_ЯНГАВОМС  "" ;
сёфтамфтумс:сёфтамфт VI_САВТОМС  "" ;
сталгавтомс:сталгавт VT_САВТОМС-ObjAll  "" ;
сэхель-меремс:сэхель-мерь VI_ЛЕДЕМС  "" ;
таргатомс:таргат VT_САТОМС-ObjAll  "" ;
толкантемс:толканть VI_НЕВТЕМС  "" ;
тошкадекшнемс:тошкадекшн VI_НЕКШНЕМС  "" ;
трёпакшномс:трёпакшно VI_КУНДАМС  "" ;
хлопадекшнемс:хлопадекшн VT_НЕКШНЕМС-ObjAll  "" ;
цибордомс:циборд VI_КАДОМС  "" ;
цильдёрк-теемс:цильдёрк-тей VI_ТЕЕМС  "" ;
чанстемс:чансть VT_НЕВТЕМС-ObjAll  "" ;
чантемс:чанть VI_НЕВТЕМС  "" ;
чаштомс:чашт VI_САВТОМС  "" ;
чентявтомс:чентявт VT_САВТОМС-ObjAll  "" ;
чентятомс:чентят VI_САТОМС  "" ;
чирьказевемс:чирьказев VI_САЕВЕМС  "" ;
эждямс:эждя VT_КУНДАМС-ObjAll  "" ;
якшавтомс:якшавт VI_САВТОМС-SG3_SUBJ/ZERO  "" ;
